zh-TW: 處理器技術: 類比; DSP; 數位; FPGA; 硬體式; 混合; 建模; 多通道; 軟體式; 管／閥; 其他
sl-SI: Procesorska tehnologija: Analogna; DSP; Digitalno; FPGA; Temelji na strojni opremi; Hibridna; Modeliranje; Večkanalna; Temelji na strojni opremi; Cev/ventil; Drugo
bg-BG: Процесорна технология: Аналогов; DSP; Цифров; FPGA; Хардуерно базиран; Хибрид; Моделиране; Многоканален; Софтуерно базиран; Тръба/клапан; Други
cs: Technologie procesoru: Analogový; DSP; Digitální; FPGA; Založená na hardwaru; Hybridní; Modelování; Více kanálů; Založená na softwaru; Trubice/ventil; Jiné
hr-HR: Tehnologija procesora: Analogni; DSP; Digitalni; FPGA; Na temelju hardvera; Hibridni; Modeliranje; Višekanalna; Na temelju softvera; Cijev/ventil; Ostalo
nb: Prosessorteknologi: Analog; DSP; Digital; FPGA; Maskinvarebasert; Hybrid; Modellering; Flerkanal; Programvarebasert; Slange/ventil; Annet
ro-RO: Tehnologia procesoarelor: Analogic; DSP; Digital; FPGA; Bazat pe hardware; Hibrid; Modelare; Multi-canal; Bazat pe software; Tub/Supapă; Altele
lt-LT: Procesoriaus technologija: Analoginis; DSP; Skaitmeninė; FPGA; Aparatinės įrangos pagrindu; Hibridinė; Modeliavimas; Daugiakanalis; Programinės įrangos pagrindu; Vamzdinis / vožtuvų; Kita
fr: Technologie du processeur: Analogique; DSP; Numérique; FPGA; Matériel; Hybrid; Modélisation; Canaux multiples; Logiciel; Tube/Valve; Autre
pl: Technologia procesorowa: Analogowy; DSP; Cyfrowe; FPGA; Sprzętowy; Hybrydowy; Modelowanie; Wielokanałowe; Programowe; Rurka/zawór; Inne
en: Processor technology: Analog; DSP; Digital; FPGA; Hardware-based; Hybrid; Modeling; Multi-channel; Software-based; Tube/Valve; Other
da: Processorteknologi: Analog; DSP; Digital; FPGA; Hardware-baseret; Hybrid; Modellering; Multi-kanal; Software-baseret; Rør/ventil; Andet
ko: 처리자 기술: 아날로그; DSP; 디지털; FPGA; 하드웨어 기반; 하이브리드; 모델링; 다채널; 소프트웨어 기반; 튜브/밸브; 기타
de: Prozessortechnologie: Analog; DSP; Digital; FPGA; Hardwarebasiert; Hybrid; Modellieren; Mehrkanal; Softwarebasiert; Schlauch/Ventil; Sonstiges
el: Τεχνολογία επεξεργαστή: Αναλογικό; DSP; Ψηφιακός; FPGA; Υποστηριζόμενος από υλικό; Υβριδικό; Κατασκευή μινιατούρας; Πολυκάναλος; Υποστηριζόμενος από λογισμικό; Σωλήνας/Βαλβίδα; Άλλο
nl: Processortechnologie: Analoog; DSP; Digitaal; FPGA; Op hardware gebaseerd; Hybride; Modelleren; Meerkanaals; Op software gebaseerd; Buis/klep; Andere
hu: Processzortechnológia: Analóg; DSP; Digitális; FPGA; Hardveralapú; Hibrid; Modellezési; Többcsatornás; Szoftveralapú; Tube/Valve; Egyéb
es: Tecnología del procesador: Analógico; DSP; Digital; FPGA; Basado en hardware; Híbrido; Modelado; Multicanal; Basado en software; Tubo/Válvula; Otros
ru: Технология процессора: Аналоговые; DSP; Цифровой; FPGA; Аппаратный; Гибридные; Моделирование; Многоканальный; Программный; Трубка/клапан; Другой
ja: プロセッサーの技術: アナログ; DSP; デジタル; FPGA; ハードウェアベース; ハイブリッド; モデリング; マルチチャンネル; ソフトウェアベース; チューブ・バルブ; その他
sk-SK: Procesorová technológia: Analógový; DSP; Digitálny; FPGA; Hardvérový; Hybridný; Modelovanie; Viackanálový; Softvérový; Rúrka/Ventil; Iné
sv: Processorteknik: Analog; DSP; Digital; FPGA; Hårdvarubaserad; Hybrid; Modellande; Flerkanalig; Mjukvarubaserad; Rör/ventil; Övrigt
it: Tecnologia del processore: Analog; DSP; Digitale; FPGA; Basato su hardware; Ibrido; Modellazione; Multicanale; Basata su software; Tubo/valvola; Altro
tr: İşlemci teknolojisi: Analog; DSP; Dijital; FPGA; Donanım tabanlı; Hibrit; Modelleme; Çok kanallı; Donanım tabanlı; Tüp/Vana; Diğer
zh-CN: 处理器技术: 模拟; DSP; 数字化; FPGA; 基于硬件; 混合型; 造型; 多通道; 基于软件; 管/阀; 其他
pt-BR: Tecnologia de processador: Analógico; DSP; Digital; FPGA; Baseado em hardware; Híbrida; Modelagem; Multicanal; Baseado em software; Tubo/Válvula; Outro
vi: Công nghệ xử lý: Analog; DSP; Kỹ thuật số; FPGA; Dựa trên phần cứng; Ván kết hợp; Mô hình hóa; Đa kênh; Dựa trên phần mềm; Ống/Van; Khác
pt-PT: Tecnologia do processador: Analógico; DSP; Digital; FPGA; Baseado em hardware; Híbrido; Modelagem; Multicanal; Baseado em software; Tubo/Válvula; Outro
fi: Prosessoriteknologia: Analoginen; DSP; Digitaalinen; FPGA; Laitteistopohjainen; Hybridi; Muovailu; Monikanavainen; Laitteistopohjainen; Putki/venttiili; Muu
th: เทคโนโลยีโปรเซสเซอร์: อนาล็อก; DSP; ดิจิทัล; FPGA; แบบใช้ฮาร์ดแวร์; แบบไฮบริด; การสร้างโมเดล; หลายช่องทาง; แบบใช้ซอฟต์แวร์; ท่อ/วาล์ว; อื่นๆ